Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-278
United States patents and certificates; where recorded.

All certificates of the register and receiver of any United States Land Office of the entry or purchase of any tract of land, and all letters patent of land from the United States lying in this state, shall be recorded in the county in which the land lies, and where any patent as above, contains descriptions of land lying in more than one county, or otherwise, it shall be lawful to record in any county the whole of the descriptions of land situated therein without recording all descriptions contained in the patent. All maps and profiles required by the government of the United States to be filed by any railroad company in any general or district land office of the United States, for the completion of the title of such company to any right-of-way granted by the United States, shall be entitled to record in the office of the register of deeds or county clerk, as the case may be, in the same manner as plats of cities and villages, and the same effect shall be given thereto as to such plats when thus filed; Provided, such record shall include all the granting or conveying part or language of such patent, and the records of such certificates and patents, and all copies thereof so recorded, duly certified by the register of deeds, shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of such certificates and patents, and conclusive evidence of the existence of such record.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 45, p. 290;

Laws 1883, c. 63, § 1, p. 264;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 25, p. 372;

Laws 1911, c. 97, § 1, p. 362;

R.S.1913, § 6246;

C.S.1922, § 5645;

C.S.1929, § 76-251;

R.S.1943, § 76-278.